Hawaii statutes.
[PART V.
ORGANIZED CRIME UNIT]

[§28-71] Organized crime unit. There
is established in the department of the attorney general an organized crime
unit.

The organized crime unit shall consist of
attorneys, and other specialized personnel necessary to implement this
section. They shall be appointed by the attorney general who shall fix their
compensation. Every attorney and specialist shall be entitled to hold the
attorney's and specialist's position during good behavior, subject to removal
by the attorney general only as provided in chapter 76.

The organized crime unit shall:

(1) Receive, gather, and analyze information;

(2) Develop tactical and strategic intelligence;

(3) Assist in control of organized criminal activity;

(4) Provide technical assistance and training to
county law enforcement agencies in the detection and prosecution of organized
crime; and

(5) Provide with the attorney general's approval
specialized personnel and technological equipment for the use of law
enforcement agencies in the State with respect to organized crime.

For purposes of this section, "organized
crime" means the unlawful activities of the members of an organized
association engaged in supplying illegal goods and services, including but not
limited to gambling, prostitution, loan sharking, narcotics, labor
racketeering, and other unlawful activities of members of such organizations.
[L 1971, c 108, §1; gen ch 1993]

Cross References

Organized crime control, see chapter 842.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next